Mississippi, session 2026, HB1543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The State of Mississippi shall not be required to comply with or recognize any mandates, orders, laws, decrees or directives handed down by any organization, commission or other entity that is not a state or federally elected official or body, or a United States citizen appointed by a state or federally elected official or body, unless such mandates, orders, laws, decrees or directives handed down by such entities are voted on and passed as legislation by the Mississippi Legislature. For purposes of this section, such organizations, commissions or other entities include, but are not limited to, international health and medical organizations, international security organizations, international military organizations, international financial organizations, and international monetary organizations or commissions. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.